Illinois, session 104th, HB5568.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Governmental and Governmental 5Employees Tort Immunity Act is amended by changing Sections 66-101 and 6-106 as follows: 7    (745 ILCS 10/6-101)  (from Ch. 85, par. 6-101)8    Sec. 6-101. As used in this Article, unless the context 9otherwise requires: 10    (a) "Medical facility" includes a hospital, infirmary, 11clinic, dispensary, medical examiner's office, coroner's 12office, mental institution or similar facility.13    (b) "Mental institution" means any medical facility or 14part of any medical facility used primarily for the care or 15treatment of persons committed for mental illness or 16addiction.17    (c) "Public health clinic" means an outpatient program 18conducted by a locally based not-for-profit corporation, or by 19any local board of health whose health department is 20recognized by, and has a designation status established by, 21the Illinois Department of Public Health and complies with the 22Public Health Standing Orders Act.23    (d) "Public health standing orders physician" means a   HB5568- 2 -LRB104 17152 JRC 30571 b1person licensed to practice medicine in all its branches in 2Illinois and who, under an agreement with a locally based 3not-for-profit corporation which conducts a public health 4clinic which provides among its services free medical services 5to indigent persons unable to pay for their own medical care, 6or a local board of health, provides medical oversight to a 7public health clinic in accordance with the following: 8        (1) reviews the standing orders for the public health 9    clinic and amends the standing orders from time to time in 10    keeping with current trends in sound medical practice; 11        (2) reviews the standing orders, as amended, with the 12    professional staff of the public health clinic at least 13    once a year; 14        (3) participates in a site visit of a clinic covered 15    by the standing orders periodically; 16        (4) signs standing orders for medical procedures 17    conducted in the public health clinic in conformance with 18    sound medical practice; and 19        (5) is available for consultation with the 20    professional clinic staff.21    (e) The changes to this Section made by this amendatory 22Act of the 97th General Assembly apply only to causes of 23actions accruing on or after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly.25    (f) The changes to this Section made by this amendatory 26Act of the 104th General Assembly apply only to causes of   HB5568- 3 -LRB104 17152 JRC 30571 b1actions accruing on or after the effective date of this 2amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.3(Source: P.A. 97-589, eff. 1-1-12.) 4    (745 ILCS 10/6-106)  (from Ch. 85, par. 6-106)5    Sec. 6-106. (a) Neither a local public entity nor a public 6employee acting within the scope of his employment is liable 7for injury resulting from diagnosing or failing to diagnose 8that a person is afflicted with mental or physical illness or 9addiction or from failing to prescribe for mental or physical 10illness or addiction.11    (b) Neither a local public entity nor a public employee 12acting within the scope of his employment is liable for 13administering with due care the treatment prescribed for 14mental or physical illness or addiction.15    (c) Nothing in this section exonerates a public employee 16who has undertaken to prescribe for mental or physical illness 17or addiction from liability for injury proximately caused by 18his negligence or by his wrongful act in so prescribing or 19exonerates a local public entity whose employee, while acting 20in the scope of his employment, so causes such an injury.21    (d) Nothing in this section exonerates a public employee 22or medical facility from liability for injury proximately 23caused by his negligent or wrongful act or omission in 24administering any treatment prescribed for mental or physical 25illness or addiction or exonerates a local public entity whose   HB5568- 4 -LRB104 17152 JRC 30571 b1employee, while acting in the scope of his employment, so 2causes such an injury.3    (e) Nothing in this section exonerates a public employee 4or medical facility from liability for injury proximately 5caused by any negligent or wrongful conduct, act, or omission, 6in the handling, identification, disposal, or treatment of a 7deceased human, or exonerates a local public entity whose 8employee, while acting in the scope of his or her employment, 9so causes such an injury.10    (f) The changes to this Section made by this amendatory 11Act of the 104th General Assembly apply only to causes of 12actions accruing on or after the effective date of this 13amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.14(Source: Laws 1965, p. 2983.)